Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB141.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "governmental entity" in section 8102 of Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Governmental entity." Board of school directors, board of public education, intermediate unit board of directors, area vocational-technical board, any governing board of any agency or authority created by them, and the Commonwealth. The term does not include an association authorized to receive membership dues 123456789101112131415161718 from a public school entity under section 516 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.* * *Section 2. The amendment of the definition of "governmental entity" in 24 Pa.C.S. § 8102 shall apply to employees of an association authorized to receive membership dues from a public school entity under section 516 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, hired after the effective date of this section, and such association shall not be considered a nonparticipating employer under 24 Pa.C.S. § 8327.1 so long as the association maintains any active participants.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0141PN0086 - 2 - 1234567891011121314